Maryland, session 2025, SB0059.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Tax – General
10–101.
(k) (1) “Resident” means:
(i) an individual, other than a fiduciary, who:
1. is domiciled in this State on the last day of the taxable
year; or
2. for more than [6] 3 months of the taxable year, maintained
a place of abode in this State, whether domiciled in this State or not;
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0059*

SENATE BILL 59
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025, and shall be applicable to all taxable years beginning after December 31, 2024.